District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Justice-Involved Youth in Community Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act, the term:
(a) “Consent decree” has the same meaning as in D.C. Code §16-2314.
(b) “Deferred disposition agreement” means an agreement between the prosecutor and
the respondent wherein the respondent pleads guilty, but the disposition is not entered, provided
that the respondent completes the terms of the agreement. If the respondent does not successfully
comply with the terms of the agreement, the respondent moves to disposition.
(c) “Deferred prosecution agreement” means an agreement between the prosecutor and
the respondent wherein the prosecutor will defer further prosecution of a case after filing


charges, provided that the respondent completes the terms of the agreement. If the respondent
does not successfully comply with the terms of the agreement, prosecution of the case will
resume.
(e) “Eligible participant” means a youth who has been referred by the Office of the
Attorney General (“OAG”) for participation in the Program.
(d) “Program” means the program established in this act.
(e) “Trusted adult” means a person 18 years of age or older assigned by the program
administrator, in consultation with OAG, to a youth who has entered into a deferred disposition
agreement, deferred prosecution agreement, or consent decree for the length of the court
agreement, with determined qualifications, including:
(1) Demonstrated training, certification, or other qualifying experience in one or
more of the following areas: behavioral health, social work, psychology, community health,
youth programming, or cultural competency; or
(2) Demonstrated prior experience as a Community Health Worker, pretrial credible
messenger, Department of Human Services truancy program staffer, or DC Peace Academy
participant.
Sec. 3. Establishment of the program.
There is established a program, to be administered by the relevant agency in consultation
with the Mayor, which shall build out the Program, offer any needed trainings, and ensure the
proper qualifications and professional certifications of a Trusted Adult to offer intensive
wraparound support to up to 50 participating youth with a deferred disposition agreement,
deferred prosecution agreement, or consent decree for the length of the agreement.
Sec. 4. Means of enrollment.


The Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia shall refer eligible
participants to the Program and require that the youth participate in the Program, including
requiring mandatory attendance to all scheduled meeting with their assigned Trusted Adult.
Sec. 5. Program details.
(a) OAG shall identify and refer participants to the Program. OAG shall consider the
following criteria in identifying the highest risk, highest need youth for participation:
(1) Whether the youth has been charged with a violent or dangerous offense;
(2) Whether the youth has previously entered a deferred disposition agreement,
deferred prosecution agreement, consent decree, or a conviction;
(3) Whether the youth has been arrested while on an active deferred disposition
agreement, deferred prosecution agreement, or consent decree;
(4) Whether the youth has been grade-retained in school within the last two
years;
(5) Whether the youth has been determined to be chronically absent in the current
or preceding school year;
(6) Whether the youth has experienced homelessness;
(7) Any other factors that the Office of the Attorney General determines to be
indicative that the youth needs additional support and resources for the length of the court
agreement.
(b) The Trusted Adult shall be selected for the Program based on qualifications
determined by the administering agency in consultation with OAG.
(c) The Trusted Adult shall be assigned to no more than two participating youth at a time.
(d) The Trusted Adult shall provide actionable support to assigned participants for the


following as needed:
(1) School attendance through engagement with the youth, their family, and their
school;
(2) Accessing and navigating transportation to and from school, out-of-school-time
activities, and employment opportunities;
(3) Applying to out-of-school-time programs or employment opportunities for the
school year and summer;
(4) Scheduling and managing healthcare appointments, including medical, dental,
and behavioral health appointments;
(5) Accessing and navigating transportation to and from healthcare appointments,
including medical, dental, and behavioral health appointments;
(6) Accessing and navigating transportation to and from appointments or meetings
required under the deferred disposition agreement, deferred prosecution agreement, or consent
decree;
(7) Tutoring services or other academic supports;
(8) Household access to food assistance, income assistance, housing assistance, or
other local or federal social safety net programs;
(9) Applications to post-secondary opportunities as appropriate;
(10) Household access to affordable childcare or dependent care;


(11) Planning for ongoing engagement in out-of-school-time activities, tutoring,
100 post-secondary opportunities, and other activities once the terms of the deferred disposition
101 agreement, deferred prosecution agreement, or consent decree are completed and Program
102 participation ends; and
103 (12) Other resources and supports as needed.
104 Sec. 6. Tracking compliance.
105 (a) OAG shall require monthly documented communication and follow-up between the
106 Trusted Adult, the probation officer, and OAG as to whether the youth is meeting the terms of
107 the agreement as related to the requirement that the youth participate in the Program.
108 (b) Beginning three months after the establishment of the Program and quarterly thereafter,
109 aggregate data on compliance and noncompliance collected in subsection (a) of this section shall
110 be shared with the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council.
111 Sec. 7. Substantive noncompliance with deferred disposition agreements, deferred
112 prosecution agreements, and consent decrees.
113 (a) If OAG enters into a deferred disposition agreement and the youth offender is
114 subsequently deemed substantively noncompliant with the requirements of the agreement, OAG
115 shall revoke the agreement and proceed with disposition as if the deferred disposition agreement
116 had never been entered.
117 (b) If OAG enters into a deferred prosecution agreement with a youth offender and the
118 youth offender is subsequently deemed substantively noncompliant with the requirements of the
119 agreement, OAG shall revoke the agreement and proceed with prosecution as if the deferred
120 prosecution agreement had never been entered.


121 (c) If OAG enters into a consent decree with a youth offender and the youth offender is
122 subsequently deemed substantively noncompliant with the requirements of the agreement, OAG
123 shall revoke the agreement and proceed with commitment as if the consent decree had never
124 been entered.
125 Sec. 8. Fiscal impact statement.
126 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
127 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
128 October 16, 2006 (12 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
129 Sec. 9. Effective date
130 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
131 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
132 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
133 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
134 Columbia Register.